Hawaii statutes.
§328-2 Same; label, etc.
"Label" means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon
the immediate container of any article; and a requirement made by or under
authority of this part that any word, statement, or other information appears
on the label shall not be considered to be complied with unless the word,
statement, or other information also appears on the outside container or
wrapper, if any there be, of the retail package of the article, or is easily
legible through the outside container or wrapper.

"Immediate container" does not
include package liners.

"Labeling" means all labels and other
written, printed, or graphic matter (1) upon an article or any of its
containers or wrappers, or (2) accompanying the article.

"Package" means any container or
wrapping in which any consumer commodity is enclosed for use in the delivery or
display of that consumer commodity to retail purchasers, but does not include
(1) shipping containers or wrappings used solely for the transportation of any
consumer commodity in bulk or in quantity to manufacturers, packers, or
processors, or to wholesale or retail distributors thereof; (2) shipping
containers or outer wrappings used by retailers to ship or deliver any
commodity to retail customers if such containers and wrappings bear no printed
matter pertaining to any particular commodity.

"Principal display panel" means that
part, or those parts, of a package or label that is, or are, so designed as to
most likely be displayed, presented, shown or examined under normal and
customary conditions of display and purchase.

Whenever the principal display panel of the
package is not coincident with the principal display panel of the label, the
principal display panel of the package shall govern the declaration of quantity
type size and the principal display panel of the label shall govern its
location.

Whenever a difference of opinion exists as to
which panel of a package constitutes the principal display panel, the larger
panel most likely to be displayed shall be so construed.

Whenever a consumer package has more than one
principal display panel, each such panel shall bear all mandatory information
required by this part and by the Federal Act.

"Principal labeler" means the
manufacturer, packer, or distributor whose name is on the package which
contains the finished drug and is distributed to the dispenser. If more than
one name is on the package, the principal labeler shall be the manufacturer,
packer, or distributor whose name is on the package and who had possession of
the package immediately before the dispenser of the drug. [L 1941, c 318, pt of
§2; RL 1945, §2202; RL 1955, §51-2; HRS §328-2; am L 1972, c 151, pt of §2; am
L 1977, c 58, §43; am L 1982, c 122, §1(2)]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next